Table of Decisions Previous Decision Next Decision Quick List of Decisions __________________________________________________________________ [ v12 p552 ] 12:552(107)CA The decision of the Authority follows: __________________________________________________________________ 12 FLRA No. 107
VETERANS ADMINISTRATION MEDICAL CENTER BATH, NEW YORK AND VETERANS ADMINISTRATION, WASHINGTON, D.C.
Respondents
and
AMERICAN FEDERATION OF GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEES, AFL-CIO, LOCAL 491 Charging Party
Case Nos. 1-CA-115 1-CA-276 1-CA-394 1-CA-397 1-CA-574
DECISION AND ORDER
The Administrative Law Judge issued the attached Decision in the above-entitled proceeding finding that the Respondents had engaged in certain unfair labor practices alleged in the consolidated complaint and recommending that they be ordered to cease and desist therefrom and take certain affirmative action.
The Judge found that the Respondents had not engaged in other unfair labor practices alleged in the consolidated complaint.
The General Counsel filed exceptions limited to the conclusion in the Judge's Decision that the allegations of the complaint in Case No. 1-CA-115 should be dismissed and as to the geographic scope of the Judge's recommended notice posting.
Pursuant to section 2423.29 of the Authority's Rules and Regulations and section 7118 of the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute (the Statute), the Authority has reviewed the rulings of the Judge made at the hearing and finds that no prejudicial error was committed.
The rulings are hereby affirmed.
Upon consideration of the Judge's Decision and the entire record in this proceeding, and noting especially the absence of exceptions in Case Nos. 1-CA-276, 1-CA-394, 1-CA-397 and 1-CA-574, the Authority hereby adopts the Judge's findings, conclusions /1/ and Recommended Order.
ORDER /2/
Pursuant to section 2423.29 of the Authority's Rules and Regulations and section 7118 of the Statute, the Authority hereby orders that the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York and the Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., shall:
1.
Cease and desist from:
(a) Instituting at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, changes in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed changes in such established practices.
(b) Interfering with, restraining, or coercing Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(c) Discouraging Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(d) Discouraging Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by the removal of Chaplain Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(e) Refusing to meet, confer and negotiate with the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by removing Chaplain Ronald Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, and by denying Chaplain Gunton the right to serve on the mentioned Equal Employment Opportunity Committee as the designated representative of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491.
(f) Interfering with, restraining, or coercing Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by the inclusion of a copy of a June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394 in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C.
(g) Instituting at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, changes in Chaplain Ronald Gunton's tour of duty without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed change in his tour of duty.
(h) In any like or related manner interfering with, restraining, or coercing its employees in the exercise of their rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
2.
Take the following affirmative action in order to effectuate the purposes and policies of the Statute:
(a) Rescind the changes effectuated on February 29, 1980, at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, in connection with the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday.
(b) Notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and upon request, negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, concerning such intended changes.
(c) Notify Reverend Paul Strickland, Director, American Baptist Chaplaincy and Pastoral Counseling, National Ministries, American Baptist Churches, Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, of this Order, and formally request the return of all documents forwarded to Reverend Strickland for the purpose of furnishing a basis for withdrawal of the endorsement of Chaplain Ronald Gunton by the American Baptist Churches.
(d) Rescind the March 18, 1980 memorandum addressed to the President of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by Mr. Milton Salmon, Medical Center Director, Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, for the purpose of effectuating termination of Chaplain Ronald Gunton's appointment to the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York.
(e) Remove from Chaplain Ronald Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., all copies of the June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394.
(f) Rescind the November 5, 1980 memorandum addressed to Chaplain Ronald Gunton by Chaplain John Howe for the purpose of effectuating a change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
(g) Notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the tour of duty assigned to Chaplain Ronald Gunton, and upon request, negotiate in good faith to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute concerning such change.
(h) Post at its facilities at the Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., and at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, copies of the attached Notice on forms to be furnished by the Federal Labor Relations Authority.
Upon receipt of such forms, they shall be signed by the Administrator, Veterans Administration Washington, D.C., or his designee, and shall be posted and maintained for 60 consecutive days thereafter, in conspicuous places, where notices to employees are customarily posted.
Reasonable steps shall be taken to insure that such Notices are not altered, defaced, or covered by other material.
(i) Pursuant to Section 2423.30 of the Authority's Rules and Regulations, notify the Regional Director, Region I, Federal Labor Relations Authority, in writing, within 30 days from the date of this Order, as to what steps have been taken to comply herewith.
IT IS HEREBY FURTHER ORDERED that the remaining allegations of the consolidated complaint be, and they hereby are, dismissed.
Issued, Washington, D.C., August 16, 1983
Barbara J. Mahone, Chairman Ronald W. Haughton, Member Henry B. Frazier III, Member FEDERAL LABOR RELATIONS AUTHORITY
NOTICE TO ALL EMPLOYEES
PURSUANT TO A DECISION AND ORDER OF THE FEDERAL LABOR RELATIONS AUTHORITY AND IN ORDER TO EFFECTUATE THE POLICIES OF CHAPTER 71 OF TITLE 5 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE FEDERAL SERVICE LABOR-MANAGEMENT RELATIONS WE HEREBY NOTIFY OUR EMPLOYEES THAT:
WE WILL NOT institute changes at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday ; through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day, without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of our employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations, and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed changes in such established practices.
WE WILL NOT interfere with, restrain, or coerce Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL NOT discourage Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by removing him from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL NOT refuse to meet, confer and negotiate with the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by removing Chaplain Ronald Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, and by denying Chaplain Gunton the right to serve on the Committee as the designated representative of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491.
WE WILL NOT interfere with, restrain, or coerce Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by including a copy of a June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394 in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C.
WE WILL NOT institute any change in Chaplain Ronald Gunton's tour of duty without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of our employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed change in his tour of duty.
WE WILL NOT in any like or related manner interfere with, restrain, or coerce our employees in the exercise of their rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL rescind the changes effectuated at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, on February 29, 1980, in connection with the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday.
WE WILL notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of our employees, of any proposed change in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and upon request, negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, concerning such intended changes.
WE WILL notify Reverend Paul Strickland, Director, American Baptist Chaplaincy and Pastoral Counseling, National Ministries, American Baptist Churches, Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, of the Order requiring this notice and posting, and request by letter, the return of all documents forwarded to Reverend Strickland for the purpose of furnishing a basis for the withdrawal of the endorsement of Chaplain Ronald Gunton by the American Baptist Churches.
WE WILL rescind the March 18, 1980 memorandum addressed to the President of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by Mr. Milton Salmon, Medical Center Director, Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, for the purpose of effectuating termination of Chaplain Ronald Gunton's appointment to the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York.
WE WILL remove from Chaplain Ronald Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., all copies of the June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394.
WE WILL rescind the November 5, 1980 memorandum addressed to Chaplain Ronald Gunton by Chaplain John Howe for the purpose of effectuating a change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
WE WILL notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of our employees, of any proposed change in the tour of duty assigned to Chaplain Ronald Gunton, and upon request, negotiate in good faith to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute concerning such change.
(Agency)
Dated: . . .
By: (Signature) (Title) This Notice must remain posted for 60 consecutive days from the date of posting, and must not be altered, defaced, or covered by any other material.
If employees have any questions concerning this Notice or compliance with its provisions, they may communicate directly with the Regional Director, Region I, Federal Labor Relations Authority, whose address is: 441 Stuart Street, 9th Floor, Boston, MA 02116, and whose telephone number is (617) 223-0920.
-------------------- ALJ$ DECISION FOLLOWS --------------------
Case Nos. 1-CA-115, 1-CA-276, 1-CA-394, 1-CA-397, 1-CA-574
John C. DiNoto, Esquire For the Respondents
Richard D. Zaiger, Esquire Carol Waller Pope, Esquire For the General Counsel
Before: LOUIS SCALZO Administrative Law Judge
DECISION
Statement of the Case
These cases arose as unfair labor practice proceedings under the provisions of the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, 92 Stat. 1191, 5 U.S.C. 7101 et seq. (hereinafter called "the Statute"), and the Rules and Regulations issued thereunder.
The consolidated complaint, amended at the hearing, alleged that the Respondents, through Veterans Administration (VA or Central Office) officials at the agency level, and through officials associated with the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York (VAMC), committed unfair labor practices within the purview of the Statute.
The following unfair labor practices were alleged:
Case No. 1-CA-115: On or About May 1, 1979, June 11, 1979, and September 27, 1979, the Respondents violated Section 7116(a)(1) of the Statute by threatening Chaplain Ronald Gunton, a part time Chaplain employed at the VAMC, with disciplinary action because of his participation in activity on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491 (Union).
/3/
Case No. 1-CA-276: On or about January 30, 1980, the Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5) by refusing to bargain in good faith with the Union regarding a decision to eliminate a practice of providing noon meals for VAMC employees assigned to serve as Medical Officer of the Day.
On or about February 29, 1980, Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5) of the Statute by eliminating a practice of providing noon meals for VAMC employees assigned to serve as Medical Officer of the Day, without furnishing the Union an opportunity to bargain concerning the decision to effectuate such change and/or the impact and implementation of the change.
On or about March 16, 1980, the Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5), changing the duty hours of the Medical Officer of the Day without furnishing the Union notice and an opportunity to bargain concerning the decision to change the duty hours of the Medical Officer of the Day, and concerning impact and implementation.
Case No. 1-CA-394: On or about April 3, 1980, the Respondents violated Section 7116(a)(1) of the Statute by initiating an investigation by the American Baptist Church into the Church accreditation of Chaplain Gunton because of his Union activity and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Statute; violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (2) by causing the American Baptist Church to investigate the Church accreditation of Chaplain Gunton because of his activity on behalf of the Union; and violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (4) by causing the American Baptist Church to investigate the Church accreditation of Chaplain Gunton because he filed unfair labor practice charges against the Respondents.
Case No. 1-CA-397: On or about June 12, 1980, Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (2) of the Statute by removing Chaplain Gunton from the VAMC Equal Employment Opportunity Committee (EEOC) because of his participation in Union activity; violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (4) by removing Chaplain Gunton from the EEOC because he filed unfair labor practice charges against the Respondents; and violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5) by refusing to deal with Chaplain Gunton as the Union's duly appointed representative on the EEOC.
Case No. 1-CA-574: On or about June 13, 1980, Respondents violated Section 7116(a)(1) by placing or causing to be placed in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file, a copy of an unfair labor practice charge dated June 10, 1980.
On or about September 1980, Respondents violated Section 7116(a)(1), (5) and (8) by holding formal discussions with Chaplain John T. Sandlund, a bargaining unit employee, concerning general conditions of employment, at which discussions the Union was not given an opportunity to be represented.
on or about October 14, 1980, Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (2) by distributing documents regarding Chaplain Gunton to the American Baptist Church in a continuing effort to cause the American Baptist Church to investigate his Church accreditation because of his participation in activities on behalf of the Union, and violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (4) because such conduct was also pursued because Chaplain Gunton filed unfair labor practice charges against the Respondents.
On or about November 5, 1980, Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (2) by changing Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty because of his Union activity, and violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5) by changing the tour of duty without furnishing the Union notice and opportunity to bargain concerning the decision to effect such change, and/or the impact and implementation of the change.
At the commencement of the hearing the Respondents moved for dismissal of Case No. 1-CA-115 on the ground that it was made the subject of a settlement agreement and a subsequent posting in accordance with the settlement agreement; and further that no basis existed for compelling the Respondents to litigate issues presented in the case.
/4/ With regard to Case No. 1-CA-276, the Respondents take the position that there was no obligation to bargain concerning the elimination of the noon meal and the changing of duty hours assigned to the Medical Officer of the Day, and that the Respondents did provide the Union with an opportunity to bargain concerning impact and implementation elements associated with these changes.
With respect to allegations in Case No. 1-CA-394 and Case No. 1-CA-574, relating to actions taken to terminate Chaplain Gunton's accreditation, and allegations in Case No. 1-CA-397, relating to Chaplain Gunton's representation of the Union on the VAMC EEOC, the Respondents argue that action taken was appropriate, and that such action was brought about by Chaplain Gunton's own misconduct.
Respondents also argue with respect to Case No. 1-CA-574, that Chaplain John T. Sandlund was not a bargaining unit employee, and that the change of Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty was effectuated in a manner consistent with the bargaining obligation imposed by the Statute.
Chaplain Gunton, a bargaining unit member, was at all times material, employed as a part time chaplain at the VAMC for a total of 20 hours a week.
For nearly a year he had been assigned a tour of duty which included 8-hour work periods on Monday and Tuesday, and a 4-hour work period on Wednesdays.
(Tr. 328-329).
He worked in conjunction with Chaplain John T. Sandlund, a full time Protestant chaplain, and chaplains representing other religious denominations.
/5/ His job duties included the usual role of clergyman.
(Tr. 485-486).
Chaplain Gunton had functioned as the Union's chief negotiator and steward for over three years.
(Tr. 300).
In his capacity as a Union official he represented bargaining unit employees in matters relating to grievances, equal employment opportunity complaints, issues concerning changes in working conditions, and unfair labor practice charges.
Prior to his association with the Union herein, Chaplain Gunton also served as President of Local 491 for about six years before Local 491 became a segment of the American Federation of Government Employees.
The answer filed by the Respondents admitted that at all times material Mr. Milton Salmon was the Director of the VAMC, Mr. Joel E. Halloran was the Chief of Personnel Services, and that Chaplain John A. Howe was Chief of the VAMC Chaplain Service.
It was also admitted that Chaplain Corbin Cherry was Chief of Chaplains for the Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C.
Mr. Salmon's assignment as Director of VAMC commenced slightly more than two years prior to April of 1981, thus his assignment coincided with Chaplain Gunton's representation of the Union as chief negotiator and steward.
(Tr. 382-383).
Respondents and the General Counsel were represented by counsel during the hearing, and all parties were afforded full opportunity to be heard, adduce relevant evidence, and examine and cross-examine witnesses.
A post-hearing brief was filed by counsel representing the General Counsel.
No brief was filed on behalf of the Respondents.
Based on the entire record herein, including my observations of the witnesses and their demeanor, the exhibits and other relevant evidence adduced at the hearing, /6/ and the brief filed, I make the following findings of fact, conclusions and recommendations.
Facts Relating to Case No. 1-CA-115
Counsel representing the General Counsel admitted that Case No. 1-CA-115 was informally settled by the parties and that an appropriate notice was posted pursuant to the settlement agreement.
(Tr. 10-11).
Subsequently the Regional Director set aside the informal settlement agreement and included Case No. 1-CA-115 allegations in the consolidated complaint because of a finding by the Regional Director that the Respondents violated the terms of the settlement agreement.
(Tr. 11).
Neither the settlement agreement, the Regional Director's findings, nor documents showing a setting aside of the settlement agreement were made a part of the record.
/7/ Respondents take the position that the terms of the settlement agreement were met.
The original charge in Case No. 1-CA-394 notes that Case No. 1-CA-115, and another charge were settled by the posting of settlement agreements on March 6, 1980.
(G.C. Exh. 1E).
Discussion and Conclusions
Case No. 1-CA-115
Section 2423.11(b)(1) of the Regulations, 5 C.F.R. 2423.11(b)(1), provides in part as follows:
Upon approval by the Regional Director and compliance with the terms of the informal settlement agreement, no further action shall be taken in the case.
If the respondent fails to perform its obligations under the informal settlement agreement, the Regional Director may determine to institute further proceedings.
It is clear from the foregoing that "further proceedings" in connection with a charge would not be justified in the absence of a clear showing that the Respondents failed "to perform . . . obligations under the informal settlement agreement."
Here the parties agree that Case No. 1-CA-115 was disposed of by a settlement agreement, and that a notice was posted in accordance with the agreement.
The terms of the settlement agreement, documentation relating to the Regional Director's setting aside of the agreement, and evidence establishing failure to perform the specific terms of the agreement are not included in the record.
Under the circumstances the record merely reflects a settlement of Case No. 1-CA-115, and bare statements by the Regional Counsel that the settlement agreement was violated by the Respondent.
In Norfolk Naval Shipyard, Case.
No. 3-CA-850, (OALJ-81-066), decided on March 12, 1981, Administrative Law Judge William B. Devaney considered a case which involved analogous issues.
He noted:
(I)t would not effectuate the purpose or policy of the Statute or the Regulations to proceed to hearing on a complaint in contravention of a settlement approved by the Regional Director and fully complied with in good faith by the Respondents, in the total absence of grounds which would warrant setting aside an approved settlement and without notice to the parties and an opportunity to be heard prior to any such proposed action.
Voluntary settlements under the control of the Regional Directors (See, Sec. 2424.11 of the Regulations) are encouraged, and indeed, are essential to the effective administration of the Statute.
Nothing would be more inherently destructive of encouragement of voluntary settlements than disregard of approved settlements after good faith compliance.
In the light of the regulatory scheme described, bare representations of counsel may not be utilized as a basis for proceeding further with allegations based upon the charge in Case No. 1-CA-115.
There must be proof of a failure to perform specific obligations imposed by a settlement agreement, and proof of the Regional Director's determination to institute further proceedings.
The threshold burden of establishing proof of these elements must be met before further proceedings in the form of an unfair labor practice complaint and hearing may be countenanced.
The record does not provide a sufficient basis upon which to make factual determinations concerning these issues.
Accordingly, it must be concluded that portions of the consolidated complaint dealing with Case No. 1-CA-115, should be dismissed.
Facts Relating to Case No. 1-CA-276
The record disclosed that management officials at the VAMC either instituted or agreed to a practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and further that individuals assigned as Medical Officer of the Day were deemed to be on duty for a 24-hour period.
(Tr. 199-200, 250-251, 284).
Evidence to the effect that VAMC management officials were not aware of the practice must be deemed not worthy of belief.
It is impossible to credit such evidence in light of the responsibility imposed upon responsible VAMC management officials.
Also, Mr. Alan Harper, Assistant Director, VAMC, testified that the VAMC changed its interpretation of regulations pertaining to the hours of the Medical Officer of the Day as a result of conversations with VA Central Office personnel.
(Tr. 201).
It thus appeared that VAMC officials were fully aware of the practice of assigning physicians to duty as Medical Officer of the Day for 24-hour periods.
Management was also aware of the closely related practice of providing noon meals to those serving as Medical Officer of the Day.
Veterans Administration regulations were unclear with respect to the practices outlined, and were subject to interpretation.
Regulations dated as early as March 25, 1963, provided that management should make "necessary arrangements which will provide continuous appropriate and effective medical supervision 24 hours a day, 7 days a week."
(G.C. Exh. 19).
/8/ An issuance dated November 9, 1971, repeats this policy and provides that "one or more physicians will be scheduled and assigned by management to provide medical supervision during evenings, nights, weekends, and holidays when the regular medical staff is not on duty, and will serve such tours of duty as local management may specify.
Physicians assigned shall be referred to as Medical Officer of the Day."
(R. Exh. 3 and G.C. Exh. 19).
/9/
Officials of the VAMC relied upon a November 9, 1979, Veterans Administration issuance to bring about a change in practice concerning meals to be provided to the Medical Officer of the Day, and the tour of duty pertaining to the assignment.
(G.C. Exh. 12, 19, and R. Exh. 4).
The document, comprised as part of a "Dietetic Service Newsletter," was issued by Central Office personnel.
It set forth no new regulatory scheme, but merely spelled out an interpretation of existing regulations.
It provided that if facilities are available, medical center management may authorize the Dietetic Service to provide meals for Medical Officer of the Day, and that only supper, and evening snacks on the day assigned, and breakfast on the following morning may be provided.
In changing the Medical Officer of the Day meal and tour of duty practice, the VAMC also relied upon direct contacts with officials in the VA Central Office.
(Tr. 167, 173-175, 192, 250-251).
It thus appeared that the Central Office was aware of impending changes at the VAMC and actually authorized such changes on the ground that past practice was inconsistent with the interpretation of existing regulations issued by the Central Office.
At a VAMC medical staff meeting on January 7, 1980, bargaining unit members were summarily informed that free noon meals for those assigned Medical Officer of the Day duties would be discontinued.
(Tr. 167, 244-245).
At a Union-management meeting held on January 8, 1980, the Union advised that the change was being effectuated without providing the Union an opportunity to negotiate; however, the Assistant Director of the VAMC advised that management was not concerned with negotiations and that negotiations would not be held because the change was being mandated by the Central Office.
(Tr. 246).
By letter dated January 13, 1980, Chaplain Gunton write the VAMC Chief of Personnel requesting that management fully negotiate issues relating to the elimination of the noon meal, and complaining that management had improperly denied the Union the right to negotiate concerning this change.
(G.C. Exh. 18).
At a January 30, 1980 meeting, VAMC officials took the position that the decision to eliminate the noon meal was not negotiable because the practice was mandated by a Government-wide rule or regulation, and that a compelling need existed for the Government-wide rule or regulation.
At this meeting it was brought out that those assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day were being required by the Chief of Medical Services at the VAMC to remain at the Center during a 24-hour tour of duty, and it was unfair to require the Medical Officer of the Day to be present during the noon meal period without providing noon meals.
Management agreed to consider this issue.
(Tr. 250, 274).
In a letter dated January 29, 1980, delivered to the Union during the January 30th meeting, Mr. Salmon relented and agreed to limited negotiations concerning the impact and implementation of the decision to eliminate noon meals.
(G.C. Exhs.20 and 21).
In a February 13, 1980 letter Mr. Salmon reiterated his position, noted that the decision to eliminate noon meals on Monday through Friday was made by the Central Office, and stated that such meals would not be provided after February 29, 1980.
(G.C. Exh. 22).
On February 29, 1980, the Monday through Friday hours of the Medical Officer of the Day were reduced to the period intervening between 4:30 p.m. and 8:00 a.m., and noon meals on these days were eliminated.
(Tr. 261, 274, 285).
Discussion and Conclusions
Case No. 1-CA-276
It is well established that the parties may establish terms and conditions of employment by practice or other form of tacit or informal agreement, and that terms or conditions established in this manner may not be altered by either party in the absence of agreement or impasse following good faith bargaining.
Department of the Navy, Naval Underwater Systems Center, Newport Naval Base, 3 FLRA No. 64 (June 16, 1980).
The record shows that there was an established past practice of providing noon meals for those assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and a correlative practice of assigning duty as Medical Officer of the Day for 24-hour periods.
VA officials at the VAMC level and Central Office level determined that it would be appropriate to terminate both of these established practices without permitting the Union to bargain fully concerning the decision to implement the changes outlined.
In the light of pertinent authorities this determination was clearly a denial of Union bargaining rights established under the provisions of the Statute.
Initially there was a categorical refusal to participate in any negotiations concerning these practices, and it was only after repeated requests that Respondents relented to the extent of agreeing to permit impact and implementation bargaining.
However, the Union, as the exclusive bargaining representative, had the right to bargain fully on issues relating to the elimination of the noon meal and the change in the 24-hour tour of duty.
Respondents' argument to the effect that the practices were discontinued in accordance with Government-wide rules or regulation must be rejected since there was no specific showing by the Respondents that practices discontinued by the Respondents were actually prohibited by Government-wide rule or regulation, and it was clear that rules and regulations introduced into the record were subject to interpretation.
Moreover, both VAMC officials and Central Office officials had previously permitted and condoned the prior practices under the regulatory pattern in effect.
Even if the VA regulatory scheme prohibited the prior practices, the record showed that it was nevertheless, a well established policy to provide noon meals and to assign Medical Officer of the Day tours of duty for 24-hour periods.
Nothing in Section 7106(b)(1) of the Statute operates to preclude a requirement that Respondents negotiate concerning the decision to change the tour of duty assigned to the Medical Officer of the Day.
It is true that if the establishment of an additional tour of duty directly relates to the numbers, types, or grades of employees assigned to the new tour of duty, the obligation to meet and confer with the Union concerning the decision to establish the new tour of duty, would come within the sole discretion and election of the agency and would therefore not be a negotiable matter.
However, if the number of employees assigned to the tour of duty, the type of grade of such employees, and the number of positions remains the same as before the change, the establishment of the new tour of duty cannot be treated as a matter negotiable only at the election of the agency.
National Treasury Employees Union Chapter 66, 1 FLRA No. 106 (September 13, 1979); American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, International Council of U.S. Marshals Service Locals, 5 FLRA No. 66 (April 29, 1981); Internal Revenue Service and Brookhaven Service Center, 5 FLRA No. 64 (April 21, 1981).
In the instant case it was shown that the establishment of the 4:30 p.m. to 8:00 a.m. tour of duty for Medical Officer of the Day did not explicitly relate to the numbers, types, and grades of employees assigned so as to come within the meaning of Section 7106(b)(1) of the Statute.
For this reason the decision to establish the new tour of duty was fully negotiable.
Accordingly, it is determined that counsel for the General Counsel has shown by a preponderance of the evidence that the conduct of management officials representing the Respondents was violative of Sections 7116(a)(5) and (1) of the Statute in that as alleged in the consolidated complaint the Respondents refused to bargain with the Union regarding the substance of the proposed elimination of the noon meal; and further, that on February 29, 1980, Respondents eliminated the noon meal; and further, that on February 29, 1980, Respondents eliminated the noon meal for Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the 24-hour tour of duty for those so assigned without first furnishing the Union an opportunity to bargain fully concerning the substance of the changes, and/or the impact and implementation of the changes.
/10/
Facts Relating to Case No. 1-CA-394 and Case No. 1-CA-397
Case No. 1-CA-394
The granting of endorsement to American Baptist clergy serving the Veterans Administration and other specialized ministries, falls within the purview of the Director, American Baptist Chaplaincy and Pastoral Counseling, National Ministries, American Baptist Churches.
The Director, Reverend Paul Strickland, serves as staff to a committee (Endorsing Committee) that grants endorsement on behalf of the American Baptist Churches.
Endorsement is a prerequisite to continued employment.
Academic credentials, a biographical sketch, letters of reference, and a personal interview are required.
Endorsements are reviewed annually.
In the absence of cause to deny endorsement, it is renewed.
The record disclosed that Chaplain Gunton has, for a number of years, had endorsement from the American Baptist Churches to function as a Veterans Administration Chaplain.
(Tr. 52).
The last two regular endorsement renewals occurred in 1979 and 1980.
(Tr. 79-80).
Early in January of 1980, Mr. Salmon wrote to Chaplain Cherry in an effort to find a way of removing Chaplain Gunton.
He enclosed a number of documents which are reflected in the record as a portion of G.C. Exh. 4.
These documents, which will be described in more detail herein, constitute severe criticism of Chaplain Gunton's method of carrying on Union representational activity.
Mr. Salmon took this action because he had no independent authority to discipline Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 410, 520-520A).
The Central Office had such authority, although Mr. Salmon did have authority to recommend disciplinary action.
(Tr. 166, 206-207).
Prior to April 3, 1980, Chaplain Cherry discussed Chaplain Gunton with Reverend Strickland and stated that he was going to request the withdrawal of Chaplain Gunton's endorsement.
(Tr. 71-72).
Reverend Strickland responded by saying that endorsement was granted for ecclesiastical purposes, that it would not be withdrawn solely for purposes of personnel management, and that although he was concerned with the quality of performance, the Church "did not see endorsement as a method of handling personnel matters."
(Tr. 73).
On April 3, 1980, Chaplain Cherry phoned Reverend Strickland to advise that VAMC officials were having continuing problems with Chaplain Gunton.
He described the documents received from Mr. Salmon, read from some of them, agreed to send copies to Reverend Strickland, and said that he thought Reverend Strickland would be interested in them from the standpoint of effectuating a withdrawal of Chaplain Gunton's endorsement.
(Tr. 55-56, 112).
On April 4, 1980, Chaplain Cherry transmitted to Reverend Strickland, copies of documents previously received from Mr. Salmon.
(Tr. 391-392, G.C. Exh. 4).
Among other things these documents reflect management complaints concerning Chaplain Gunton's criticism of working conditions at the VAMC, management resentment over his having filed unfair labor practice charges against VAMC officials, general non-specific complaints concerning Chaplain Gunton's representational activity, general criticism of the Union, accounts of disagreement with positions taken by Chaplain Gunton in labor relations matters, self-serving statements by VAMC officials concerning labor relations subjects, and accounts of the performance of innocuous activities by Chaplain Gunton on behalf of the Union.
Chaplain Cherry admitted that he reviewed the material before mailing it.
(Tr. 507-508).
He subsequently informed Mr. Salmon that he had mailed the documents to Reverend Strickland and that Reverend Strickland would phone Mr. Salmon directly about Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 416).
Following Reverend Strickland's receipt of materials from Chaplain Cherry, the Endorsing Committee met on April 7, 1980, to consider the matter.
The Committee reaffirmed American Baptist policy to the effect that endorsement must relate to ecclesiastical matters and not personnel management.
(Tr. 76).
On the same date, April 7th, Reverend Strickland phoned Mr. Salmon.
/11/ Among other things Mr. Salmon was severely critical of the amount of time Chaplain Gunton spent on Union activity and EEO complaints.
He stated that his Union activity was a source of disruption to the hospital routine, and requested that Chaplain Gunton's endorsement be withdrawn as a means of terminating his employment.
(Tr. 66-99).
Mr. Salmon explained that it was very difficult for the Government to terminate Chaplain Gunton based upon any documented misconduct, that a reduction in force was not a possibility, and that withdrawal of his endorsement was a method of removing him.
(Tr. 67).
Reverend Strickland insisted upon written documentation from Mr. Salmon to support his request for withdrawal of the endorsement.
Mr. Salmon discussed additional documentation, read portions of it over the phone, and said he would send it to Reverend Strickland.
(Tr. 67-68).
By letter dated April 7, 1980, Mr. Salmon transmitted to Reverend Strickland a series of documents relating to Chaplain Gunton's representational activity.
(Tr. 452, G.C. Exh. 5).
The documents reflect information concerning Mr. Salmon's prior removal of Chaplain Gunton from his position as Union designated representative on the EEOC, criticism of his conduct on the EEOC, and concern over issues raised by Chaplain Gunton as the Union representative on the EEOC.
On April 23, 1980, Mr. Salmon again wrote to Reverend Strickland, to provide further evidence of a reason for withdrawal of endorsement.
This document reflects criticism of Chaplain Gunton's role as an advisor to a bargaining unit member during a removal proceeding, and Mr. Salmon's disagreement with factual representations alleged to have been made by Chaplain Gunton.
(G.C. Exh. 6).
As a result of material and information received from Chaplain Cherry and Mr. Salmon, and solely because of such (Tr. 128-129), the Endorsing Committee met on May 7, 1980 and determined that Chaplain Gunton's endorsement should be considered in jeopardy, and further that members of the Committee would make a site visit to investigate allegations received.
(Tr. 76).
Mr. Salmon and Chaplain Gunton were informed of the determination.
(Tr. 76-77, G.C. Exh. 7).
Reverend Strickland's testimony established that the Endorsing Committee had also received evidence of Chaplain Gunton meeting requirements for his position, and further that the Committee was also concerned over the strain that he might be under.
(Tr. 116).
Members of the Endorsing Committee conducted an investigation at the VAMC on May 29, 1980.
Reverend Strickland wrote to Chaplain Cherry on June 16, 1980, on behalf of the Committee and characterized the matter as one involving personnel management at the VAMC, as distinct from issues relating to ecclesiastical endorsement.
(G.C. Exh. 8).
He noted that the VAMC Chief of Chaplains had provided satisfactory performance ratings consistently, and also expressed "grave concern" about Chaplain Cherry's support of Chaplain Gunton.
The Committee found no reason to discontinue his endorsement.
(Tr. 131-132).
On June 18, 1980 Chaplain Cherry phoned Reverend Strickland to complain further about Chaplain Gunton and the Committee's findings.
Reverend Strickland informed him that "from our point of view, our chaplain is performing acceptable ministry."
Chaplain Cherry hung up abruptly when Reverend Strickland disagreed with him.
(Tr. , 82-83).
On July 29, 1980, Chaplain Cherry wrote to Reverend Strickland and noted that Chaplain Gunton's activity caused "uneasiness and tension," and implied that this was cause with withdrawal of endorsement.
(G.C. Exh. 9).
He admitted that it was Chaplain Gunton's dealing with VAMC management that constituted the gravamen of his concern (Tr. 552, 557), and that the documents transmitted to Reverend Strickland, in large measure, formed the basis for his wanting Chaplain Gunton terminated.
(Tr. 557-558).
In addition to the foregoing sequence of events the record shows that Mr. Salmon admitted that Chaplain Gunton was a problem because he was involved in Union activities and that he was deemed to be disruptive in this respect.
(Tr. 209-210).
Mr. Salmon maintained "Reports of Contact" regarding Chaplain Gunton's contact with VAMC employees because of his perceptions of Chaplain Gunton's Union activities.
(Tr. 212).
Mr. Salmon acknowledged that he discussed with Chaplain Cherry, the material that he sent to Chaplain Cherry (Tr. 413), in order for the Central Office to take action against Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 484-485).
He also stated that he asked for Chaplain Cherry's assistance in resolving his problems with Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 519).
Counsel representing the Respondents acknowledged that 16 of the 18 pages comprising G.C. Ex. 4, on which Chaplain Cherry and Mr. Salmon relied as a basis for their action, related to Chaplain Gunton's Union activities.
(Tr. 412).
Mr. Salmon admitted that he thought the filing of 12 unfair labor practice charges (without more) was evidence of disruptive misconduct (Tr. 488), and that the Union at the VAMC was "disruptive" in nature.
(Tr. 489).
He acknowledged that he had no recourse under removal procedures pertaining to federal employees, and that he discussed with Chaplain Cherry the option of going to the Endorsing Committee to effect Chaplain Gunton's removal.
(Tr. 493-494).
The record reflects that Chaplain John A. Howe, Chief of the VAMC Chaplain Service, gave Chaplain Gunton a satisfactory performance rating for the one-year period preceding April 30, 1980.
(G.C. Exh. 23).
With one exception he was reported to have exceeded work requirements.
In March of 1981, he received a step promotion from GS-12, Step 5 to GS-12, Step 6.
Chaplain Howe characterized his work as being of an acceptable level of competence.
(G.C. Exh. 24).
Chaplain Gunton was never disciplined for improper conduct (Tr. 414-415, 485), and Mr. Salmon never initiated or threatened disciplinary action through VA channels of authority.
(Tr. 484, 496-497).
In fact, Mr. Salmon admitted that Chaplain Gunton had done nothing to warrant disciplinary action, and stated merely that he had been "objectionable" to management.
(Tr. 492).
Chaplain Cherry acknowledged that there was nothing in Chaplain Gunton's personnel file that would identify deficiencies in Chaplain Gunton's service as a chaplain.
(Tr. 547).
Case No. 1-CA-397
In accordance with pertinent statutory and regulatory provisions an EEOC has been in existence at the VAMC for a number of years.
The VAMC EEOC Committee is responsible for advising the Station Director (EEO Officer) on overall EEO problems and approaches for carrying out special assignments relating to EEO, as may be required.
Among other things EEO Officers are charged with establishing and maintaining a positive action program designed to insure equality of opportunity.
(R. Exh. 8).
The work of the VAMC EEOC deals with numerous subjects having a direct impact on the terms and conditions of employment at the VAMC.
The Committee is comprised of 12 members and 2 counselors at large.
Mr. Salmon, the Center Director, as the designated EEO Officer retains the final authority for determining the composition of the Committee.
(R. Exh. 8 at A-4).
However, VA regulations provide that "employee and recognized labor organization recommendations should be considered to assure selection of committee members in whom they have confidence."
In response to this policy it was an established practice at the VAMC for the Union President and Union Executive Committee to submit to the Director (Mr. Salmon), the name of a Union representative to serve on the VAMC EEOC.
(Tr. 232-233).
The person selected was designated by the Union to represent Union interests and the Director had no authority over the appointment.
(Tr. 431-432).
Other members of the EEOC were selected through a nominating committee appointed by Mr. Salmon and then either approved or disapproved by him.
(Tr. 232).
Prior to April 18, 1979, Mr. Bennett Joseph, the President of the Union had a discussion with Mr. Salmon, wherein Mr. Joseph mentioned Chaplain Gunton as a possible Union representative on the Committee.
(Tr. 233-234).
Chaplain Gunton had served on the EEOC previously as an alternate member and as an interim appointee.
(Tr. 286).
Mr. Salmon advised that he thought Chaplain Gunton would be a "disruptive influence."
(Tr. 234, 267).
Mr. Joseph explained that the selection of a representative was matter of internal Union business.
(Tr. 234).
On April 18, 1979, Mr. Joseph appointed Chaplain Gunton to serve as the Union representative on the Committee.
(G.C. Exh. 15).
He commenced service as a Committee member and had the right to vote on issues pertaining to EEOC business.
(Tr. 370).
After Chaplain Gunton's appointment Mr. Salmon expressed regret that Chaplain Gunton had been appointed (Tr. 235-236, 267, 269), ostensibly because another chaplain also served on the EEOC.
(Tr. 236).
On March 18, 1980, Mr. Salmon wrote to Mr. Joseph to advise him that he would no longer permit Chaplain Gunton to serve as the Union representative because he was considered "objectionable" to other Committee members, and because his conduct was deemed "highly disruptive to the effectiveness of the Committee."
(G.C. Exh. 5 at 2).
Mr. Joseph took no action to appoint a replacement because Mr. Salmon had presented no concrete evidence to justify removal of Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 242).
The record indicated that Mr. Salmon removed Chaplain Gunton because of his Union activity on the EEOC and because of his representational work generally at the VAMC.
He admitted relying upon materials reflected in G.C. Exhs. 4 and 5, which include descriptions of Chaplain Gunton's representational work on the EEOC.
(Tr. 405-407).
Prior to preparation of the March 18, 1980 memorandum he consulted with VA Central Office officials and received approval of his plan to remove Chaplain Gunton from the EEOC.
(Tr. 399, 432, 434-435).
A careful examination of the record disclosed that Chaplain Gunton's representation of the Union led to serious disagreement with Mr. Salmon and members of the EEOC associated with VAMC management.
Their complaints were general and non-specific (i.e. that he intimidated others, obstructed and interfered with Committee business, and was unethical).
However, the record did not supply a basis for concluding that Chaplain Gunton had been guilty of any specific misconduct.
Mr. Salmon acknowledged that he had never observed any misconduct and that he had relied on the reports of others.
(Tr. 382, 398).
A careful review of the reports indicates they may be construed as a management version of Union representational activity.
As noted, in a number of situations conduct described was clearly innocuous in nature.
On June 12, 1980, Chaplain Gunton attended an EEOC meeting.
The President of the Union refused to accede to a request to order Chaplain Gunton to leave when requested to do so in a telephone call placed to the Union President by the Assistant Director of the VAMC.
However, following Chaplain Gunton's formal objection to his removal, Chaplain Gunton did leave the Committee meeting at the request of the Assistant Director.
(Tr. 307-309).
Discussion and Conclusions
Case Nos. 1-CA-394 and 1-CA-397
Respondents take the position that their activities designed to effect withdrawal of Chaplain Gunton's endorsement, and his removal from the EEOC were predicated upon his misconduct during the course of his representational activity.
In each instance Chaplain Gunton was acting officially as chief negotiator, steward, or the selected Union representative to the VAMC EEOC.
When an employee who is also a Union official is acting in an official capacity as a union official, he is entitled to greater latitude in speech and action.
U.S. Small Business Administration, Central Office, Washington, D.C., 6 A/SLMR 157, A/SLMR No. 631 (March 26, 1976); /12/ Department of the Navy, Puget Sound Naval Shipyard, Bremerton, Washington, 2 FLRA No. 7 (November 2, 1979); Department of the Army, Headquarters, Military Traffic Management Command, 2 FLRA No. 72 (January 25, 1980); Veterans Administration Regional Office, Denver, Colorado, 2 FLRA No. 84 (February 21, 1980); Department of Housing and Urban Development San Francisco Area Office, San Francisco, California, 4 FLRA No. 64 (September 30, 1980).
The mentioned cases make it clear that although the Authority does not endorse the use of intemperate or strident language in the conduct of labor relations, not every impropriety committed by an employee while engaged in protected activity is beyond the ambit of protected activity.
The cited decisions also indicate that in order to remove the questioned acts from the ambit of protection, the employee must be found to have engaged in flagrant misconduct.
In this case Respondents' allegations are couched in generalities, and reflect no specific actions which might be classified as flagrant misconduct.
At most Chaplain Gunton's conduct consisted of strong, vigorous representation and robust debate on behalf of the Union.
Many of the incidents relied upon by Respondents were patently innocuous representational activity, or mere accounts of management arguments concerning labor-management issues.
The record suggests at some points that representatives of the Respondents equated Chaplain Gunton's representation of the Union point of view with personal misconduct.
The absence of any suggestion of reprimand of, or disciplinary action against, Chaplain Gunton by Respondents; the admission that no basis existed for formal disciplinary action; Chaplain Gunton's performance ratings; and the obvious pretextual nature of the complaints surrounding the charges of misconduct; also indicate that Respondents' allegations of misconduct have no basis to support them.
In light of the foregoing it must be determined that Chaplain Gunton's behavior was well within the ambit of protected activity.
It is noted that in order to establish a violation of Section 7116(a)(2) there must be a showing that the alleged victim of discrimination was engaging in protected activity, that the agency had knowledge of such activity, and that the agency took action because of anti-union animus.
United States Department of Labor, 1 FLRA No. 120 (September 28, 1979); Veterans Administration Center, Leavenworth, Kansas, 1 FLRA No. 111 (September 20, 1979); U.S. Customs Service, Region IV, Miami, Florida, 1 FLRA No. 108 (September 13, 1979).
The element of discriminatory motivation needed to establish a Section 7116(a)(2) violation may be inferred from circumstantial evidence.
U.S. Customs Service, Region IV, Miami, Florida, supra; Veterans Administration Center, Leavenworth, Kansas, supra.
The Authority has also held that in examining discrimination where an employee asserts a facially lawful business justification for the alleged discriminatory action, it would examine such cases through an analysis similar to that used by the United States Supreme Court in Mt. Healthy City School District Board of Education v. Doyle, 529 U.S. 274 (1977) (involving conduct protected by the United States Constitution).
The Authority stated that the burden is on the General Counsel to make a prima facie showing that the employee had engaged in protected activity and that the prohibited conduct was a motivating factor in the administrative action taken by the agency.
Once this is established, the agency may avoid responsibility only by showing by a preponderance of the evidence that it would have reached the same decision or taken the same action even in the absence of protected activity.
Internal Revenue Service, Washington, D.C., 6 FLRA No. 23 (June 17, 1981); Veterans Administration, Medical and Regional Office Center, White River Junction, Vermont, 6 FLRA No. 68 (August 5, 1981).
In this case the facts demonstrate that Respondents, through Chaplain Cherry and Mr. Salmon, caused the initiation of an investigation by the American Baptist Churches into the Church accreditation of Chaplain Gunton in order to effect a withdrawal of his endorsement and termination of his employment.
The evidence also shows that Respondents through Mr. Salmon and Central Office officials, brought about the removal of Chaplain Gunton from the VAMC EEOC.
Both patterns of administrative action were pursued because Chaplain Gunton engaged in protected activity under the Statute on behalf of the Union, and because he initiated unfair labor practices against the VAMC.
Moreover, the record reflects that the reasons advanced by the Respondents for taking such administrative action were pretextual in nature.
This element is demonstrated repeatedly in the record, particularly by the fact that Chaplain Gunton's endorsement was renewed in 1979 and 1980; by the many indications that Mr. Salmon and Chaplain Cherry resented Union activity at the VAMC, and Chaplain Gunton's use of time on behalf of the Union; by admissions that no legal basis could be found for disciplining Chaplain Gunton; by the innocuous nature of many of the complaints relied upon by Respondents as a basis for actions taken; by the absence of any clear showing of misconduct; and by the satisfactory performance ratings given by Chaplain Howe throughout the pertinent period.
However, even if it is assumed that the rule articulated in Internal Revenue Service, Washington, D.C., supra, is applicable here, there was no evidence introduced by Respondents showing that the questioned administrative actions would have taken place in any event had Chaplain Gunton not been engaged in protected activity.
On the basis of the foregoing it is concluded that the Respondents, as alleged in Case No. 1-CA-394, violated Section 7116(a)(1) of the Statute by causing the initiation of an investigation into Chaplain Gunton's church accreditation because of his engaging in Union activity, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges against the Respondents.
It is also concluded that this conduct involved Respondents in violations of Section 7116(a)(2), (4), and (1) of the Statute.
Similarly, in connection with Case No. 1-CA-397, it is determined that Respondents' removal of Chaplain Gunton from the EEOC on or about March 18, 1980, and June 12, 1980 was violative of Section 7116(a)(2), (4), (5) and (1) of the Statute.
Facts Relating to Case No. 1-CA-574
(a) Inclusion of Charge in Personnel Extension File
The record showed that Chaplain Cherry, as VA Chief of Chaplains, maintained in Washington, D.C., a duplicate personnel file, or personnel extension file, relating to Chaplain Gunton.
(Tr. 517-518).
The file was designed to be identical to the official personnel file maintained at the VAMC, and was subject to review in connection with personnel actions.
(Tr. 550-551).
Chaplain Cherry acknowledged that he "probably" was responsible for placing in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file, a copy of the original unfair labor practice charge filed in Case No. 1-CA-394.
(Tr. 558).
The charge was added to the file between June 10, 1980 and June 26, 1980.
(Tr. 321-322, G.C. Exh. 25).
(b) Submission of Documents to Reverend Strickland on or
About October 14, 1980
On or about October 14, 1980, Chaplain Cherry transmitted to Reverend Strickland a series of documents which he claimed related to Chaplain Gunton's service as a chaplain.
The documents pertained to a dispute arising out of a personal family matter involving Chaplain Gunton.
(G.C. Exh. 10).
The transmission of the material was clearly shown to be a continuation of the effort launched by Mr. Salmon and Chaplain Cherry to terminate Chaplain Gunton's endorsement because of his involvement in Union activities.
The documents were not solicited by Reverend Strickland, and did not pertain to Chaplain Gunton's activities as a chaplain.
(Tr. 85-86).
Chaplain Cherry's forwarding letter refers back to Reverend Strickland's previously questioned decision to continue Chaplain Gunton's endorsement, and indicates that the material was being sent as a part of the effort to terminate Chaplain Gunton.
On October 24, 1980 Reverend Strickland wrote to Chaplain Cherry to advise that the documents had no bearing on Chaplain Gunton's functioning at Bath, and stated:
I regret that the implication in your letter is that this indicates that Chaplain Gunton still has problems at Bath because of a family situation . . . .
I do not see how this family dispute pertains to Chaplain Gunton's functioning or competency as a chaplain . . . .
(G.C. Exh. 11).
After conferring with a member of the Endorsing Committee, Reverend Strickland determined that the material was not worthy of the Committee's consideration.
(Tr. 129-131).
(c) Chaplain John T. Sandlund Alleged to Have Attended Formal
Discussions, and Change in Chaplain Gunton's Tour of Duty
In September of 1980, Chaplain Howe, VAMC Chief of Chaplains and Chaplain John T. Sandlund, a bargaining unit member, had a general discussion concerning the possibility of changing tours of duty to relieve Chaplain Sandlund of the responsibility of having to conduct two worship services on Sundays.
(Tr. 651).
/13/ It appeared that the request emanated from Chaplain Sandlund, who had health problems, but was still continuing to perform duties as a chaplain.
(Tr. 651, 661).
Chaplain Howe said that he would consider Chaplain Sandlund's request.
(Tr. 669).
At a later date during the early part of September 1980, Chaplain Cherry, Chaplain Howe, Chaplain Sandlund, and two other VAMC chaplains other than Chaplain Gunton, discussed a possible change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty to lighten Chaplain Sandlund's Sunday schedule.
(Tr. 659-661).
The meeting was not formal in nature, but an impromptu encounter wherein bargaining unit employees took advantage of an opportunity to complain to those in supervisory authority.
(Tr. 660).
Chaplain Cherry indicated his approval of the proposed change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
(Tr. 331-332, 660-661).
Subsequently in September 1980, Chaplain Sandlund was with Chaplain Howe on at least one occasion when the proposed change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty was discussed with Mr. Salmon.
(Tr. 374-376).
They brought to Mr. Salmon's attention the suggestion that Chaplain Gunton assume some of Chaplain Sandlund's Sunday duties, and Mr. Salmon agreed to the proposal.
(Tr. 377-378).
/14/
Chaplain Sandlund subsequently formalized his request for a tour of duty change in an October 30, 1980 memorandum to Chaplain Howe.
(G.C. Exh. 28).
By memorandum of the same date Chaplain Howe, at Mr. Salmon's request, sent a memorandum to Mr. Salmon to request the tour of duty change.
(Tr. 663-664, G.C. Exh. 29).
The request was thereafter formally approved by Mr. Salmon.
On November 4, 1980, Chaplain Howe met with Chaplain Gunton and Chaplain Sandlund about the matter.
Chaplain Howe explained that Chaplain Sandlund could not provide two Protestant services on Sundays and that Chaplains Sandlund and Howe were proposing that Chaplain Gunton assume Sunday duties.
(Tr. 324-325).
Chaplain Gunton interposed objections on a number of grounds.
Among other things, he pointed out that the proposed change affected working conditions, that it was a negotiable issue, and that it would constitute an economic hardship.
He noted that he performed outside work as a clergyman on Sundays and that he was paid for this work.
(Tr. 325-327, 672).
Chaplain Howe said that he would take the matter up with higher management (Tr. 328), but that he was not impressed with the argument that he was under an obligation to negotiate.
(Tr. 672).
Mr. Salmon, Chaplain Howe, and the VAMC Personnel Officer acknowledged that the Union, as distinct from Chaplain Gunton personally, never received notice of the proposed change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
(Tr. 358-359, 380, 581, 652-653, 657).
Although negotiations were in fact requested by Chaplain Gunton, the opportunity to negotiate was never provided.
(Tr. 345).
On November 12, 1980, Chaplain Gunton received a memorandum dated November 5, 1980 from Chaplain Howe, advising that a new 4-day tour of duty to include the hours of 8:00 a.m. to noon on Sundays, 7:45 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. on Mondays, 8:00 a.m. to noon on Tuesdays, and 3:30 p.m. to 7:30 p.m. on Wednesdays, would be assigned to him as of November 16, 1980.
(G.C. Exh. 26).
/15/ Chaplain Gunton went to see Chaplain Howe to repeat his objections to the change; however, apart from receiving a delay in the date of implementation, Chaplain Gunton was unsuccessful.
/16/ The new tour of duty became effective on November 23, 1980.
(G.C. Exh. 27).
Discussion and Conclusions
Case No. 1-CA-574
(a) Inclusion of Charge in Chaplain
Gunton's Personnel Extension File
The original charge in Case No. 1-CA-394 was retained in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file in Chaplain Cherry's Office.
The file was designed for use in connection with personnel actions.
The charge in question related to the pattern of unfair labor practice allegations involving Chaplain Cherry's and Mr. Salmon's efforts to effect withdrawal of Chaplain Gunton's accreditation because of his activity on behalf of the Union.
The record does not reflect evidence concerning the manner in which the charge found its way into the file.
However, circumstantial evidence adduced during the hearing points clearly to either the involvement of management officials representing the Respondents, or VA Central Office placement of the document in Chaplain Gunton's file on behalf of the VA and VAMC as a further manifestation of antipathy toward Chaplain Gunton because of his Union activity.
The filing interfered with, restrained and coerced Chaplain Gunton in the exercise of Chaplain Gunton's rights under the Statute.
This conclusion necessarily follows from the fact that awareness of such a filing would have had a chilling effect on Chaplain Gunton's continued participation in Union activities.
On the basis of this rationale it is concluded that the inclusion of the charge in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file constituted a violation of Section 7116(a)(1).
(b) Submission of Documents to Reverend
Strickland on or About October 14, 1980
Chaplain Cherry's transmission of material to Reverend Strickland on or about October 14, 1980 represented an abortive continuation of Mr. Salmon's and Chaplain Cherry's plan to effect the withdrawal of Chaplain Gunton's endorsement.
Although it appears to have been put into motion by Chaplain Cherry, the record discloses that Mr. Salmon and Chaplain Cherry were acting in concert with respect to efforts to generate as much basis as possible for Reverend Strickland to use as a reason for withdrawing Chaplain Gunton's endorsement.
Although the documents related to an innocuous personal family dispute involving Chaplain Gunton, they were transmitted to Reverend Strickland by Chaplain Cherry because of Chaplain Gunton's involvement in activity on behalf of the Union, and because of his filing unfair labor practices against the VAMC.
Accordingly, it is concluded that the transmission of documents on or about October 14, 1980, constituted violations of Sections 7116(a)(2), (4), and (1) by the Respondents.
(c) Chaplain John T. Sandlund Alleged to Have Attended Formal
Discussions, and Change in Chaplain Gunton's Tour of Duty
Section 7114(a)(2)(A) of the Statute provides:
(2) An exclusive representative of an appropriate unit in an agency shall be given the opportunity to be represented at--
(A) any formal discussion between one or more representatives of the agency and one or more employees in the unit or their representatives concerning any grievance or any personnel policy or practices or other general condition of employment . . . .
Although there is little or no case law specifically construing the provisions of Section 7114(a)(2)(A), cases construing Section 10(e) of Executive Order 11491, are relevant since the terminology used in Section 10(e) is nearly identical to that utilized in Section 7114(a)(2)(A).
In Department of Defense, U.S. Navy, Norfolk Naval Shipyard, 1 FLRA No. 32, May 1, 1979, an unfair labor practice case initiated under Executive Order 11491, the Authority approved the following language used by the Federal Labor Relations Council in its Lyndon B. Johnson Space Center (NASA) decision: /17/
The language of the pertinent portion of section 10(e) . . . makes clear that it is not the intent of the Order to grant to an exclusive representative a right to be represented in every discussion between agency management and employees.
Rather, such a right exists only when the discussions are determined to be formal discussions and concern grievances, personnel policies and practices, or other matters affecting the general working conditions of unit employees.
(Footnotes omitted).
The Authority's decision in 1 FLRC No. 32, also adopted the following Council language from the Council's decision reviewing the Assistant Secretary's decision in A/SLMR No. 908:
Thus, the discussion or meeting for which representation is sought must be 'formal' in nature and the topic of the meeting must be one or more of the matters enumerated in the last sentence of section 10(e), i.e., 'grievances, personnel policies and practices, or other matters affecting general working conditions of employees in the unit.'
Both elements must exist for the right of representation under section 10(e) to accrue either to the exclusive representative or, derivatively, to the employee involved.
As to the first element, the question of whether a meeting is 'formal' or informal is essentially a factual determination which, in our view, is a matter best resolved on a case-by-case basis by the Assistant Secretary as finder of fact, taking into consideration and weighing a variety of factors such as: who called the meeting and for what purpose; whether written notice was given; where the meeting was held; who attended; whether a record or notes of the meeting were kept; and what was actually discussed.
(Footnotes omitted).
The Federal Labor Relations Council in considering a case arising under Sections 19(a)(1) and (6) of Executive Order 11491, as amended, Department of the Navy, Naval Air Station, Fallon, Nevada, A/SLMR No. 432, FLRC No. 74A-80, 3 FLRC 697 (1975) held that the following criteria should be used in determining whether a communication amounts to an attempt to bypass the exclusive representative:
In determining whether a communication is violative of the Order, it must be judged independently and a determination made as to whether that communication constitutes, for example, an attempt by agency management to deal or negotiate directly with unit employees or to threaten or promise benefits to employees.
In reaching this determination, both content of the communication and the circumstances surrounding it must be considered.
More specifically, all communications between agency management and unit employees over matters relating to the collective bargaining relationship are not violative.
Rather communications which, for example, amount to an attempt to bypass the exclusive representative and bargain directly with employees, or which urge employees to put pressure on the representative to take a certain course of action, or which threaten or promise benefits to employees are violative of the Order.
(Footnote omitted).
In U.S. Department of the Air Force, 47th Air Base Group (ATC), Laughlin Air Force Base, Texas, 4 FLRA No. 65, the Authority rejected the suggestion that a Section 7116(a)(1) and (5) bypass of the Union occurred when management dealt directly with employees to determine if they would be willing to work elsewhere during closure of a portion of an activity.
The quoted portion of the Fallon decision was considered in part by Administrative Law Judge Oliver in the decision subsequently affirmed by the Authority.
He noted that the discussions did not concern any personnel policy or practices or conditions of employment affecting employees in the unit generally, and that management did not attempt to negotiate or deal with employees in order to obtain their agreement to management's position, or to put pressure on the Union to take a certain course of action.
Applying the principles outlined to the facts presented in this case it is noted that Section 7114(a)(2)(A) is inapplicable because there was no evidence to indicate a showing that any of the meetings were "formal" in nature, and further the subject discussed did not relate to personnel policies and practices, or other matters affecting the general working conditions of bargaining unit employees.
In each case it appeared that Chaplain Sandlund initiated brief informal contacts with management in an effort to be relieved of some of his Sunday duties.
In each case management responded to the request in limited terms applicable solely to Chaplain Sandlund's situation.
These circumstances reflect the absence of formality, and the absence of discussion of any grievances, personnel policies or practices, or other general conditions of employment.
Since Section 7114(a)(2)(A) requires proof of the two mentioned elements, and since such proof is not reflected in the record, it must be concluded that counsel for the General Counsel has not established its burden of proof with respect to this segment of Case No. 1-CA-574.
Similarly, in determining whether such discussions were a bypass within the meaning of Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5), it is noted the discussions described do not meet the criteria previously established by the Authority in U.S. Department of the Air Force, 47th Air Base Group (ATC), Laughlin Air Force Base, Texas, supra.
Here there was no apparent attempt to deal or negotiate directly with bargaining unit employees concerning personnel policies or practices, or other conditions of employment affecting employees in the unit generally.
As noted, Chaplain Sandlund initiated the request for a change in his tour of duty, and the meetings were informal in nature.
There was no attempt on management's part to bypass the Union and deal directly with bargaining unit employees, or which urged employees to put pressure on the representative to take a certain course of action, or which threatened or promised benefits to employees.
Accordingly, it is concluded that the record does not reflect proof of any violation of Section 7116(a)(1) and (5) in connection with Chaplain Sandlund's meetings with management.
With respect to allegations that Respondents discriminatively changed Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty because of his Union activities it is noted that there is circumstantial evidence in the record indicating that Mr. Salmon's and Chaplain Cherry's participation in discussion with Chaplain John T. Sandlund concerning the change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty, and Respondent's approval of the tour of duty changes, were motivated in part by anti-union animus.
In fact, the facts clearly suggest that Chaplain Sandlund's request may have been welcomed by Respondents' representatives because of their opposition to Chaplain Gunton's Union activity.
However, the record clearly indicates that Chaplain Gunton was the only Protestant Chaplain at the VAMC other than Chaplain Sandlund, and further that Chaplain Sandlund's health provided a strong reason for relieving him of some of his Sunday duties.
Under these circumstances it must be concluded that the record shows by a preponderance of the evidence that Respondents would have reached the same decision or taken the same action even in the absence of protected activity.
Because of this evidentiary showing portions of Case No. 1-CA-574 alleging violations of Sections 7116(a)(1), and (2) based upon discriminatory conduct relating to the change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty provide no basis for a finding in favor of the Union.
Internal Revenue Service Washington, D.C., supra; Veterans Administration, Medical and Regional Office Center, White River Junction, Vermont, supra.
In considering the bargaining obligation relating to Respondents' determination to modify Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty, it is first noted that there was an obligation to bargain concerning the decision to effectuate the change because the change did not as proposed and effectuated, explicitly relate to the numbers, types, and grades of employees assigned so as to come within the purview of Section 7106(b)(1) of the Statute.
National Treasury Employees Union Chapter 66, supra; American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, International Council of U.S. Marshals Service Locals, supra; Internal Revenue Service and Brookhaven Service Center, supra.
The record reflects that the decision to modify Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty occurred as early as September of 1980 on occasions when Chaplain Hose, Chaplain Cherry and Mr. Salmon indicated their approval of Chaplain Sandlund's request to be excused from a portion of his Sunday duties.
Formal approval occurred on or about October 30, 1980 and November 5, 1980.
The Union never received notice of the proposed change, /18/ and there was a refusal to bargain concerning the matter although Chaplain Gunton subsequently requested negotiations.
Counsel for the General Counsel argued during the hearing that a March 7, 1979 settlement agreement involving the parties herein (G.C. Exh. 14); but in connection with other unrelated cases, established the duty to bargain concerning the decision to change Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty, as well as issues pertaining to impact and implementation; and further that the unilateral change of his tour of duty constituted a patent breach of this agreement.
The March 7, 1979 settlement agreement might be interpreted as imposing a contractual obligation to bargain fully on this subject.
Insofar as is pertinent here the settlement agreement provides:
Changes of tours of duty or methods of rotation through tours of duty and days off shall be first negotiated in writing.
Response to Management proposals to fill new duty tours or change tour rotation methods shall be made by the Union within two weeks.
(G.C. Exh. 14).
The meaning of the quoted language is unclear as the word "negotiated" is not specifically defined, and the agreement was not shown to be applicable to this case.
It is not possible to construe the provision so as to establish a patent breach of the agreement as a separate unfair labor practice in this case.
Moreover, the consolidated complaint alleges no breach of the March 7, 1979 settlement agreement.
For the purposes of this litigation it is sufficient to say that the settlement agreement includes no waiver of the Union's statutory right to negotiate in this area of concern.
On the basis of the foregoing it must be concluded that Respondents acted in violation of Sections 7116(a)(5) and (1) by formulating a decision to change Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty without providing the Union with adequate notice of the change and an opportunity to negotiate concerning the decision to make the change and/or the impact and implementation of the change.
Having found that the Respondents violated Sections 7116(a)(1) and (5) in Case No. 1-CA-276; Sections 7116(a)(1), and (2), and (4) in Case No. 1-CA-394; Sections 7116(a)(1), (2), (4), and (5) in Case No. 1-CA-397; and Sections 7116(a)(1), (2), (4), and (5) in Case No. 1-CA-574, it is recommended that the Authority issue the following Order:
ORDER
Pursuant to Section 2423.29 of the Federal Labor Relations Authority's Rules and Regulations and Section 7118 of the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, the Authority hereby orders that the Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., and the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, shall:
1.
Cease and desist from:
(a) Instituting at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath New York, changes in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed changes in such established practices.
(b) Interfering with, restraining, or coercing Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(c) Discouraging Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(d) Discouraging Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by the removal of Chaplain Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
(e) Refusing to meet, confer, and negotiate with the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by removing Chaplain Ronald Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, and by denying Chaplain Gunton the right to serve on the mentioned Equal Employment Opportunity Committee as the designated representative of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491.
(f) Interfering with, restraining, or coercing Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by the inclusion of a copy of a June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394, in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C.
(g) Instituting at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, changes in Chaplain Ronald Gunton's tour of duty without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed change in his tour of duty.
(h) In any like or related manner interfering with, restraining, or coercing its employees in the exercise of their rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
2.
Take the following affirmative action in order to effectuate the purpose and policies of the Statute:
(a) Rescind the changes effectuated on February 29, 1980, at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, in connection with the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday.
(b) Notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and upon request, negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, concerning such intended changes.
(c) Notify Reverend Paul Strickland, Director, American Baptist Chaplaincy and Pastoral Counseling, National Ministries, American Baptist Churches, Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, of this Order, and formally request the return of all documents forwarded to Reverend Strickland for the purpose of furnishing a basis for withdrawal of the endorsement of Chaplain Ronald Gunton by the American Baptist Churches.
(d) Rescind the March 18, 1980 memorandum addressed to the President of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by Mr. Milton Salmon, Medical Center Director, Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, for the purpose of effectuating termination of Chaplain Ronald Gunton's appointment to the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York.
(e) Remove from Chaplain Ronald Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., all copies of the June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394.
(f) Rescind the November 5, 1980 memorandum addressed to Chaplain Ronald Gunton by Chaplain John Howe for the purpose of effectuating a change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
(g) Notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the tour of duty assigned to Chaplain Ronald Gunton, and upon request, negotiate in good faith to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute concerning such change.
(h) Post at its facilities at the Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., and at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, copies of the attached notice marked "Appendix" on forms to be furnished by the Federal Labor Relations Authority.
Upon receipt of such forms, they shall be signed by the Administrator, Veterans Administration Washington, D.C., or other appropriate official at the Washington, D.C. level of the Veterans Administration, and shall be posted and maintained for 60 consecutive days thereafter, in conspicuous places, where notices to employees are customarily posted.
Reasonable steps shall be taken by Respondents to insure that such notices are not altered, defaced, or covered by other material.
(i) Pursuant to Section 2423.30 of the Authority's Rules and Regulations, notify the Regional Director, Region I, Federal Labor Relations Authority, in writing, within 30 days from the date of this Order, as to what steps have been taken to comply herewith.
IT IS HEREBY FURTHER ORDERED that the allegations in the consolidated complaint found not to be violations of the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute be, and hereby are, dismissed.
LOUIS SCALZO Administrative Law Judge
Dated: September 23, 1981 Washington, DC
NOTICE TO ALL EMPLOYEES
PURSUANT TO A DECISION AND ORDER OF THE FEDERAL LABOR RELATIONS AUTHORITY AND IN ORDER TO EFFECTUATE THE POLICIES OF CHAPTER 71 OF TITLE 5 OF THE UNITED STATES CODE FEDERAL SERVICE LABOR-MANAGEMENT RELATIONS WE HEREBY NOTIFY OUR EMPLOYEES THAT:
WE WILL NOT institute changes at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day, without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations, and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed changes in such established practices.
WE WILL NOT interfere with, restrain, or coerce Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL NOT discourage Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by causing the initiation of investigation into his Church accreditation because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL NOT discourage Chaplain Ronald Gunton from membership in a labor organization by removing him from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, because of his participation in protected activities on behalf of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, and because he filed unfair labor practice charges under the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL NOT refuse to meet, confer, and negotiate with the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by removing Chaplain Ronald Gunton from the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, and by denying Chaplain Gunton the right to serve on the Committee as the designated representative of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491.
WE WILL NOT interfere with, restrain, or coerce Chaplain Ronald Gunton in the exercise of rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute by including a copy of a June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394 in Chaplain Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C.
WE WILL NOT institute any change in Chaplain Ronald Gunton's tour of duty without first notifying the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, and affording such representative the opportunity to negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law and regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, with regard to any proposed change in his tour of duty.
WE WILL NOT in any like or related manner interfere with, restrain, or coerce our employees in the exercise of their rights assured by the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute.
WE WILL rescind the changes effectuated at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, on February 29, 1980, in connection with the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday.
WE WILL notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the practice of providing a noon meal to physicians assigned duty as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and the practice of assigning 24-hour tours of duty to those selected to serve as Medical Officer of the Day on Monday through Friday, and upon request, negotiate in good faith, to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute, concerning such intended changes.
WE WILL notify Reverend Paul Strickland, Director, American Baptist Chaplaincy and Pastoral Counseling, National Ministries, American Baptist Churches, Valley Forge, Pennsylvania, of the Order requiring this Notice and posting, and request by letter, the return of all documents forwarded to Reverend Strickland for the purpose of furnishing a basis for the withdrawal of the endorsement of Chaplain Ronald Gunton by the American Baptist Churches.
WE WILL rescind the March 18, 1980 memorandum addressed to the President of the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, by Mr. Milton Salmon, Medical Center Director, Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, for the purpose of effectuating termination of Chaplain Ronald Gunton's appointment to the Equal Employment Opportunity Committee serving the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York.
WE WILL remove from Chaplain Ronald Gunton's personnel extension file in the Office of the Chief of Chaplains, Veterans Administration, Washington, D.C., all copies of the June 10, 1980 unfair labor practice charge relating to Case No. 1-CA-394.
WE WILL rescind the November 5, 1980 memorandum addressed to Chaplain Ronald Gunton by Chaplain John Howe for the purpose of effectuating a change in Chaplain Gunton's tour of duty.
WE WILL notify the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, Local 491, the exclusive representative of its employees, of any proposed change in the tour of duty assigned to Chaplain Ronald Gunton, and upon request, negotiate in good faith to the extent consonant with law, regulations and the Federal Service Labor-Management Relations Statute concerning such change.
(Agency or Activity)
Dated: . . .
By: (Signature) This Notice must remain posted for 60 consecutive days from the date of posting and must not be altered, defaced, or covered by any other material.
If employees have any questions concerning this Notice or compliance with any of its provisions, they may communicate directly with the Regional Director, Federal Labor Relations Authority, whose address is: 441 Stuart Street, 9th Floor, Boston, MA 02116, and whose telephone number is (617) 223-0920.
--------------- FOOTNOTES$ ---------------
/1/ In full agreement with the Judge's dismissal of the allegations contained in the complaint in Case No. 1-CA-115, the Authority notes particularly its adoption of the recommended decision in Norfolk Naval Shipyard, 10 FLRA No. 105 (1983), which was relied upon by the Judge herein in reaching his determination.
/2/ In denying General Counsel's exceptions seeking to broaden the recommended notice posting to include all the Activities in the consolidated unit, the Authority, noting particularly that the unlawful conduct occurred basically at the Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, and additionally involved only one official from the National Office, concludes that a limited posting as recommended by the Judge would best effectuate the purpose of the Statute.
See, e.g., National Treasury Employees Union, 10 FLRA No. 91 (1982), appeal docketed, No. 83-1054 (D.C.
Cir. Jan. 13, 1983).
/3/ On October 20, 1977, the Union was certified as the exclusive representative of all professional and nonprofessional employees, including canteen employees at the VAMC, excluding temporary employees who do not have reasonable expectancy of continued employment, cemetery employees, management officials, employees engaged in federal personnel work in other than a purely clerical capacity, and supervisors.
On February 28, 1980, the American Federation of Government Employees, AFL-CIO, was certified as the exclusive representative of all professional and nonprofessional employees described as part of separate consolidated Veterans Administration professional and nonprofessional units.
/4/ Respondents did not file a post-hearing brief, and apart from the answer filed and brief oral statements of counsel made during the course of the hearing, did not present a detailed explanation of position relating to the many issues posed in the consolidated complaint.
Counsel of record were required to file post-hearing briefs.
(Tr. 681).
/5/ Chaplain Gunton and Chaplain Sandlund were the only Protestant chaplains at the VAMC.
(Tr. 385-386).
/6/ Counsel for the General Counsel moved to correct the transcript as follows:
Page Line Change To
10 17 Institute Authority
11 4 Institute Statute
12 8 110 115
19 16 Institute Statute
21 6 711685 7116(a)(5)
83 9 I he
173 14 Medical Federal
207 1 incurrence concurrence
247 1 who she
303 21 Peter Heeter (and all subsequent references).
679 9 diminution elimination
The motion to correct is granted.
The following additional corrections are made in the hearing transcript:
Page Line Change To
1A 10 withdrawn 466
5 3 Institute Statute
27 13 934 394
32 6 talking taking
189 1 212 2.12
189 18 mean meal
222 18 Stranton Strand
681 20 is ruled on has ruled on it
681 22 Relations is Relations Authority is concerned
/7/ See also Veterans Administration Medical Center, Bath, New York, 4 FLRA No. 76 (November 12, 1980 and January 8, 1981), for references to the settlement of Case No. 1-CA-115 prior to hearing.
/8/ This regulatory provision also suggests authorization for furnishing noon meals to those assigned Medical Office of the Day duties by inclusion of the following language: "When it is management's decision to maintain an 'Officer of the Day' roster, conditions will be specified under which the 'Officer of the Day will inspect patients' meals.
If management determines that continuous medical supervision will be provided by any other arrangement, then these persons will not be permitted 'Officer of the Day' meal privileges in the Dietetic area."
A subsequent regulation dated August 7, 1968 appeared to have some relationship to the subject, but could not definitely be tied to the issue on the basis of the record developed.
(G.C. Exh. 13).
/9/ As noted, it was clearly established that the practice at the VAMC was to assign physicians to Medical Officer of the Day duties for a 24-hour period.
Thus, while serving a regular shift a physician so assigned would be available during the lunch period as well as the period following normal duty hours.
Those so assigned were given a noon meal for this reason.
The parties stipulated that prior to February 29, 1980, the effective date of the elimination of the noon meal, Medical Officers of the Day were required, "during some period prior to February 29, 1980," to stay at the duty station during the noon meal hour.
(Tr. 679).
/10/ In Veterans Administration, 1 FLRA No. 101 (August 21, 1979), the Authority held in an Executive Order case that agency officials operating at lower organization levels may not be held responsible for carrying out instructions issued at higher levels of the agency.
The facts presented in this case evidence involvement of both Central Office officials and VAMC officials in the denial of the Union's right to negotiate.
There was no showing that VAMC officials should be absolved because of the principle expressed in the cited case.
That is, the record did not show that when VAMC officials denied bargaining rights in this case, they were taking such action solely because of the issuance of VA Central Office instructions to implement changes without according the Union bargaining rights provided by the Statute.
/11/ The record reflects that Mr. Salmon and Reverend Strickland had more than one conversation (Tr. 44-45), and further that there was a general discussion of Chaplain Gunton's conduct.
(Tr. 416).
/12/ The Assistant Secretary relied on Old Dominion Branch No. 496, National Association of Letter Carriers, AFL-CIO v. Austin, 418 U.S. 264 (1974), in which the Supreme Court concluded that Executive Order 11491 did not intend to restrict in any way, the "robust debate" which has been protected under the National Labor Relations Act.
/13/ Although the Respondents claimed that Chaplain Sandlund was a "management official" within the meaning of Section 7103(a)(1) of the Statute, and that the Union had no right to be present at discussions involving Chaplain Sandlund, the record failed to reflect any basis for a finding that he was a management official.
Chaplain Sandlund had no authority over Chaplain Gunton (Tr. 386), and like other VAMC Chaplains, was under Chaplain Howe's supervision.
(Tr. 670).
There was no evidence or argument showing that Chaplain Sandlund's duties required or authorized him to formulate, determine, or influence the policies of the Veterans Administration.
Instead, the record indicated that Chaplain Sandlund, like Chaplain Gunton, was a bargaining unit employee.
/14/ The record does suggest more than one meeting attended by these three individuals.
However, it would not be possible to find, on the basis of the record developed, that more than one meeting occurred.
/15/ Chaplain Gunton's prior 3-day tour of duty involved the following hours: Monday - 7:45 a.m. to 4:30 p.m., Tuesday - 7:45 a.m. to 4:30 p.m., and Wednesday - 3:30 p.m. to 7:30 p.m.
/16/ Mr. Joseph, President of Local 491, also transmitted to the VAMC Personnel Officer, a November 12, 1980 memorandum formally requesting negotiations.
(G.C. Exh. 30).
No action was taken in response to this request.
(Tr. 658-659).
/17/ National Aeronautics and Space Administration (NASA), Washington, D.C., and Lyndon B. Johnson Space Center (NASA), Houston, Texas, A/SLMR No. 457, 3 FLRC 617 (FLRC No. 74A-95 (September 26, 1975)).
The Authority's decision in 1 FLRA No. 32, resulted from Authority review of the Federal Labor Relations Council's decision remanding a decision of the Assistant Secretary of Labor for Labor-Management Relations in Department of Defense, U.S. Navy, Norfolk Naval Shipyard, A/SLMR No. 908, (FLRC No. 77A-141 (December 28, 1978)).
/18/ Notice to Chaplain Gunton on November 4, 1980, in his capacity as a bargaining unit employee was not sufficient.
United States Air Force, Air Force Logistics Command, Aerospace Guidance and Metrology Center, Newark, Ohio, 4 FLRA No. 70 (October 24, 1980).
__________________________________________________________________
Table of Decisions Previous Decision Next Decision Quick List of Decisions
